Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.210

Board of adjustment—Membership—Quorum.

A board of adjustment shall consist of five or seven members as may be provided by ordinance, and a majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 24 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.210. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 21.]